Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.060

Additional authority of secretary.

In addition to the authority specified in RCW 18.130.050 and 18.130.062, the secretary has the following additional authority:

(1) To employ such investigative, administrative, and clerical staff as necessary for the enforcement of this chapter. The secretary must, whenever practical, make primary assignments on a long-term basis to foster the development and maintenance of staff expertise. To ensure continuity and best practices, the secretary will regularly evaluate staff assignments and workload distribution;

(2) Upon the request of a board or commission, to appoint pro tem members to participate as members of a panel of the board or commission in connection with proceedings specifically identified in the request. Individuals so appointed must meet the same minimum qualifications as regular members of the board or commission. Pro tem members appointed for matters under this chapter are appointed for a term of no more than one year. No pro tem member may serve more than four one-year terms. While serving as board or commission members pro tem, persons so appointed have all the powers, duties, and immunities, and are entitled to the emoluments, including travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, of regular members of the board or commission. The chairperson of a panel shall be a regular member of the board or commission appointed by the board or commission chairperson. Panels have authority to act as directed by the board or commission with respect to all matters subject to the jurisdiction of the board or commission and within the authority of the board or commission. The authority to act through panels does not restrict the authority of the board or commission to act as a single body at any phase of proceedings within the board's or commission's jurisdiction. Board or commission panels may issue final orders and decisions with respect to matters and cases delegated to the panel by the board or commission. Final decisions may be appealed as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW, the administrative procedure act;

(3) To establish fees to be paid for witnesses, expert witnesses, and consultants used in any investigation and to establish fees to witnesses in any agency adjudicative proceeding as authorized by RCW 34.05.446;

(4) To conduct investigations and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining authority and to issue subpoenas, administer oaths, and take depositions in the course of conducting those investigations and practice reviews at the direction of the disciplining authority;

(5) To have the health professions regulatory program establish a system to recruit potential public members, to review the qualifications of such potential members, and to provide orientation to those public members appointed pursuant to law by the governor or the secretary to the boards and commissions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(b), and to the advisory committees and councils for professions specified in RCW 18.130.040(2)(a); and

(6) To adopt rules, in consultation with the disciplining authorities, requiring every license holder to report information identified in RCW 18.130.070.

[ 2008 c 134 s 4; 2006 c 99 s 1; 2001 c 101 s 1; 1995 c 336 s 5; 1991 c 3 s 269; 1989 c 175 s 68; 1987 c 150 s 3; 1984 c 279 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.